Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. LEGISLATION

CHAPTER 315. ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT

Sec. 315.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Economic Impact Statement Act.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 315.002. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "state agency" means:

(1) any department, commission, board, office, or other agency that:

(A) is in the executive branch of state government;

(B) has authority that is not limited to a geographical portion of the state; and

(C) was created by the constitution or a statute of this state; or

(2) an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, other than a public junior college or community college.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 315.003. STATE POLICY. Recognizing the impact of the laws and rules of this state on the economy, employment, and enterprise of its people, the legislature declares that the continuing policy of this state is to maintain and create conditions that will sustain and promote the economy, employment, and economic opportunities of the people of Texas.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 315.004. ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT. (a) At the request of the lieutenant governor or speaker of the house of representatives, a state agency shall prepare an economic impact statement for any pending bill or joint resolution that directly affects that agency. Preparation of the statement shall be coordinated through the Legislative Budget Board director.

(b) The economic impact statement must include:

(1) a brief description of the nature and effect of the proposal; and

(2) a statement of the manner and extent to which the proposal, if implemented, will directly or indirectly during each of the two years following its effective date:

(A) affect employment in the state, including the number of people affected, the geographic area or areas affected, and the existing level of employment and unemployment in those areas;

(B) affect the construction, modification, alteration, or utilization of any structure, equipment, facility, process, or other asset in the state, including the estimated dollar measure of the action and the geographic area or areas affected;

(C) result in changes in costs of goods and services in the state;

(D) result in changes in revenue and expenditures of state and local governments; and

(E) have economic impacts within the state other than those specifically described by this subsection.

(c) An economic impact statement that omits any information required by this chapter must specifically note the omission, state the reason for the omission, and estimate the additional time and effort required to obtain the information.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.